Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WASECA; SANITARY SEWER IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $8,900,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Waseca to design, construct, and provide construction-related engineering for improvements to and replacement of sanitary sewer infrastructure to reduce inflow and infiltration into the system and increase sanitary sewer system conveyance capacity, including reconstruction of the Nelson Lift Station. This appropriation includes money for reconstruction of streets, roadways, sidewalks, and other infrastructure within the project areas. This appropriation does not require a nonstate match. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $8,900,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end